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DI110-06

DTC P 1300/14 Igniter Circuit Malfunction No. 1

DTC P 1310/15 Igniter Circuit Malfunction No.2

DTC P 1320/14 Igniter Circuit Malfunction No.3
CIRCUIT DESCRIPTION

A DIS (Direct Ignition System) has been adopted. The DIS improves the ignition timing accuracy, reduces
high-voltageloss, and enhancesthe overall reliability of the ignition system by eliminating the distributor.
TheDISisa2 -cylindersimultaneous ignition system whichignites 2 cylinders simultaneously with 1 ignition
coil.Inthe2 -cylinder simultaneousignition system, each ofthe 2 spark plugsis connected to the end ofthe
secondary winding. High voltage generated in the secondary winding is applied directly to the 2 spark plugs.
The sparks of the 2 spark plugs pass simultaneously from the center electrode to the ground electrode.
The engine ECU determines ignition timing and outputs the ignition signals (IGT) for each cylinder. Based
on IGT signals, the power transistors in the igniter cuts off the current to the primary coil in the ignition coil
is supplied simultaneously tothe 2 spark plugs via the high —-tension cords thatare connectedtothe both
ends of the secondary coil. At the same time, the igniter also sends an ignition confirmation signal (IGF) as
afail —-safe measuretothe engine ECU.
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DTC No DTC Detecting Condition Trouble Area
*OpenorshortinIGF or IGT1 circuitfrom ignition coil to
P1300/14 No IGE si.gnalte en..gineEGUfor 6 consecutive IGT.Lsi  w.gnalg engineEGU..
during engine running «Ignition coil No.1 (w/ Igniter)
*EngineECU
* OpenorshortinIGF or IGT2 circuit fromignition coil to
P1310/15 No IGF signalto engine ECU for 6 consecutive IGT2 signals engine ECU.
during engine running « Ignition coil No.2 (w/ Igniter)
*EngineECU
* Openorshortin IGF or IGT3 circuit fromignition coil to
P1320/14 No IGF signalto engine ECU for 6 consecutive IGT3 signals engine ECU.
during engine running « Ignition coil No.3 (w/ Igniter)
*EngineECU
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INSPECTION PROCEDURE

HINT:

. Read freed frame data using hand-held tester. Because freeze frame records the engine conditions
when the malfunction is detected, when troubleshooting it is useful for determining whether the vehicle
was running or stopped, the engine warmed up or not, the air-fuel ratio lean or rich, etc. at the time
of the malfunction.

. DTC P1300/14 is for the ignition circuit of No.1 and No.6 cylinders.

. DTC P1310/15 is for the ignition circuit of No.2 and No.5 cylinders.

. DTC P1320/14 is for the ignition circuit of No.3 and No.4 cylinders.

Check spark plug and spark (See page IG-1).

NG> Go to step 4.

@

2Ch

eckforopenandshortin harness and connectorinIGF 1 signal circuit
between engine ECU and ignition coil No.1, No.2 No.3 (See page IN-19).

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

@

3 Difconnect ignitioncoilNo. 1,No.2,No.3 connectors and checkvoltage between

terminal IGF 1 ofengine ECU connector and body ground.

BE6653
P23731

PREPARATION:

(@) Disconnect the ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connectors.
(b) Remove the glove compartment door.

(¢)  Turn the ignition switch ON.

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminal IGF1 of engine ECU con-
nector and body ground.

IGF1 OK:

(+) T soontr Voltage:4.5 - 5.5V

OK> Replace ignition coil No. 1,No.2,No.3.

]
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Check and replace engine ECU

(See page IN-19).

4 Check for open and short in harness and connector in IGT1, 2, 3 signal circuit
between engine ECU and ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 (See page IN-19).

@

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

5 [ Check voltage between terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU connector and body

~

- ' IGT3 (+)

A05855
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@
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ground.
START PREPARATION:
Remove the grove compartment door.

Measure voltage between terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU
connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5V

Reference: INSPECTION USING OSCILLOSCOPE

During idling, check waveform between terminals IGT1, 2, 3
and E1 of engine ECU.

HINT:

The correct waveform are as shown.

IGT2, IGT3 signal waveform is same as the IGT1 signal wave-
form.

NG Checkandreplace engine ECU
(See page IN-19).
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6 [ Disconnect ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connector and check voltage between
terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU connector and body ground.

START PREPARATION:
@ (a) Disconnect the ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connectors.
IGTL IGT2 () (b) Remove the glove compartment door.

~

CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminals IGT1, 2, 3 of engine ECU
V AT, 18 ﬁﬁﬁﬁﬂﬂﬁﬂmgﬂ connector and body ground when engine is cranked.
OK:

= = Voltage: More than 0.1 V and less than 4.5V
IGT3 (+)

@

7 | Check ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 power source circuit.

A05855

NG> Replace ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3.

f ON PREPARATION:
@ & Disconnect the ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 connectors.
START \ CHECK:

Measure voltage between terminal 1 of ignition coil (w/ ignitor)
connector and body ground, when ignition switch is turned to
"ON” and "START" position.
OK:

Voltage: 9 - 14V

BE6653
A02525 1 (+)

3

8 [ Check for open and short in harness and connector between ignition switch and
ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 (See page IN-19).

A03855
NG Repair ignition coil No.1, No.2, No.3 power
source circuit.

NG> Repair or replace harness or connector.

OK
~_—
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9 [Check EFI main relay (Marking: EFI) (See page FI-44).

@

Replace ignition coil No.1, No.2, ,No.3.

NG> Replace EFI main relay (Marking: EFI).
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